West Virginia, session 2026, HB5554.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. REGULATION AND CONTROL OF ELECTIONS. §3-8-2c. Party headquarters committee; detailed accounts and verified financial statements; funding for headquarters; limitations; reporting requirements. (a) Notwithstanding the definitions contained in section one-a of this article, for purposes of this section:(1) "Contribution" means a gift, subscription, loan, assessment, payment for services, dues, advance, donation, pledge, contract, agreement, forbearance or promise of money or other tangible thing of value, whether conditional or legally enforceable, or, a transfer of money or other tangible thing of value to a person, made for the purpose of funding the rental, purchase, construction or financing of the lease, purchase or construction of a party headquarters, and for the utilities, maintenance, furniture, fixtures, and equipment for the party headquarters. An offer or tender of a contribution is not a contribution if expressly and unconditionally rejected or returned. A contribution does not include volunteer personal services provided without compensation: Provided, That a nonmonetary contribution is to be considered at fair market value for reporting requirements and contribution limitations.(2) "Party headquarters" means a physical structure or structures that is the physical location of the office of a state executive committee of a political party.(3) "Party headquarters committee" includes any person, organization or group of persons soliciting or receiving contributions for the purpose of funding the lease, purchase, construction or financing of the lease, purchase, or construction of a party headquarters, including utilities, maintenance, furniture, fixtures, and equipment for the party headquarters, or for a county executive committee’s headquarters.(4) "County executive committee" means the executive committee of a political party, as defined by §3-1-8 of this code, which is situate in, and responsible for, the conduct of that party’s business in one of the constituent counties of the state.(b) A political party, or a county executive committee of a political party, may establish a party headquarters committee to solicit and receive contributions for the exclusive purpose of the purchase, construction or lease of an office building or financing of the lease, purchase, or construction of a party headquarters, including utilities, maintenance, furniture, fixtures, and equipment, to be used as a state political party’s headquarters, or, as a county executive committee’s headquarters.(c) Contributions received pursuant to this section may not be expended for:(1) The purchase, construction or lease of satellite offices or other facilities;(2) Utilities, maintenance, furniture, fixtures, equipment or signage for satellite offices or other facilities; or(3) Political purposes.(d) A party headquarters committee may not accept contributions in excess of $10,000, in the aggregate $50,000 annually from any person for the purposes of this section.(e) A party headquarters committee may not receive contributions or make expenditures for the purpose of funding the rental, purchase, construction, or financing of a state executive committee headquarters, or a county executive committee’s headquarters, which are in excess of $1 million.(f) (1) A party headquarters committee, financial agent, or any person or officer acting on behalf of the committee, that is subject to the provisions of this section, shall file a verified financial statement with the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the secretary, within 90 days of any contribution or expenditure in excess of $250.(2) Each financial statement shall contain, but is not limited to, the following information:(A) The name, residence and mailing address and telephone number of the party headquarters committee, financial agent, or any person or officer acting on behalf of the committee, who is filing the financial statement.(B) The balance of cash, and any other sum of money, on hand at the beginning and the end of the period covered by the financial statement.(C) The name of any person making a contribution, the amount of the contribution, and the residence and mailing address of the contributor.(D) The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the financial statement.(E) The name, residence and mailing address of any individual or the name and mailing address of each lending institution making a loan, the amount of any loan received, the date and terms of the loan, including the interest and repayment schedule, and a copy of the loan agreement.(F) The name, residence, and mailing address of any individual, or the name and mailing address of each partnership, firm, association, committee, organization, or group having previously made or cosigned a loan for which payment is made or a balance is outstanding at the end of the period, together with the amount of repayment on the loan made during the period and the balance at the end of the period.(G) The total outstanding balance of all loans at the end of the period.(H) The name, residence, and mailing address of any person to whom each expenditure was made, or liability incurred, together with the amount and purpose of each expenditure or liability incurred, and the date of each transaction.(I) The total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the financial statement.(3) The Secretary of State shall file and retain the statements as public records for not less than six years.(g) Contributions received by a party headquarters committee may be contributed to any educational, cultural, or charitable organization.(h) The Secretary of State shall propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to effectuate the provisions of this section. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home